Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.100

Meetings of members and shareholders.

Meetings of members and/or shareholders may be held at such place, either within or without this state, as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall be held at the registered office of the corporation in this state.

An annual meeting of the members and shareholders shall be held at such time as may be provided in the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the designated time shall not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

Special meetings of the members or shareholders may be called by the president or by the board of directors. Special meetings of the members or shareholders may also be called by such other officers or persons or number or proportion of members or shareholders as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the number or proportion of members or shareholders entitled to call a meeting, a special meeting of members or shareholders may be called by persons having one-twentieth of the votes entitled to be cast at such meeting. Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by RCW 24.06.105 may be conducted at a special meeting.

If the articles of incorporation or bylaws so provide, members or shareholders may participate in any meeting of members or shareholders by any means of communication by which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other during the meeting. A member or shareholder participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

[ 2001 c 271 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 20.]